Utah statutes.
20A-14-102.2.   Uncertain boundaries -- How resolved.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Affected party" means:

(i)  a state school board member whose State Board of Education district boundary is uncertain because the feature used to establish the district boundary in the Board shapefile has been removed, modified, or is unable to be identified or who is uncertain about whether or not the member or another person resides in a particular State Board of Education district;

(ii)  a candidate for state school board whose State Board of Education district boundary is uncertain because the feature used to establish the district boundary in the Board shapefile has been removed, modified, or is unable to be identified or who is uncertain about whether or not the candidate or another person resides in a particular State Board of Education district; or

(iii)  a person who is uncertain about which State Board of Education district contains the person's residence because the feature used to establish the district boundary in the Board shapefile has been removed, modified, or is unable to be identified.

(b)  "Feature" means a geographic or other tangible or intangible mark such as a road or political subdivision boundary that is used to establish a State Board of Education district boundary.

(2) (a)  An affected party may file a written request petitioning the lieutenant governor to determine:

(i)  the precise location of the State Board of Education district boundary;

(ii)  the number of the State Board of Education district in which a person resides; or

(iii)  both Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (ii).

(b)  In order to make the determination required by Subsection (2)(a), the lieutenant governor shall review:

(i)  the Board shapefile; and

(ii)  other relevant data such as aerial photographs, aerial maps, or other data about the area.

(c)  Within five days of receipt of the request, the lieutenant governor shall:

(i)  review the Board block shapefile;

(ii)  review any relevant data; and

(iii)  make a determination.

(d)  If the lieutenant governor determines the precise location of the State Board of Education district boundary, the lieutenant governor shall:

(i)  prepare a certification identifying the appropriate State Board of Education district boundary and attaching a map, if necessary; and

(ii)  send a copy of the certification to:

(A)  the affected party;

(B)  the county clerk of the affected county; and

(C)  the Automated Geographic Reference Center created under Section 63F-1-506.

(e)  If the lieutenant governor determines the number of the State Board of Education district in which a particular person resides, the lieutenant governor shall send a letter identifying that district by number to:

(i)  the person;

(ii)  the affected party who filed the petition, if different than the person whose State Board of Education district number was identified; and

(iii)  the county clerk of the affected county.



Amended by Chapter 455, 2013 General Session

